District of Columbia statutes.
28-3310

Consumer protections.

(a)

(1)

A lender who receives scheduled periodic payments on more than 5 loans or financial transactions in a calendar year shall furnish to the borrower, upon request, but not more than 2 times a year, a statement, in writing stating the amount of:

(A)

payments credited to reducing the principal;

(B)

payments credited to interest;

(C)

the remaining unpaid principal balance;

(2)

A lender who receives scheduled periodic payments on more than 5 loans or financial transactions in a calendar year shall furnish to the borrower, at least 6 months and not more than 12 months prior to maturity of the loan or financial transaction, or, if the loan or financial transaction is for a period of less than 1 year, halfway through the loan period, a statement, in writing, stating the following:

(A)

in the case of a loan or financial transaction which contains a schedule of payments under which each payment is not equal to, or substantially equal to, the other payments or if the intervals between payments are not substantially equal, the date or event upon which maturity occurs, and the projected principal loan balance that will be due at maturity of the loan or financial transaction; and

(B)

in the case of a loan or financial transaction where the interest rate is not fixed for the term of the loan, the projected principal loan balance that will be due at maturity, assuming no change in the interest rate, and the conditions under which the interest rate may change and what limits or restrictions, if any, apply to changes in the interest rate.

(b)

No delinquent or late charge shall be contracted for or received which does not meet all of the following requirements:

(1)

the delinquency shall have continued for at least 10 calendar days;

(2)

a delinquent or late charge shall not have already been charged for the same delinquent or late periodic installment; and

(3)

the delinquent or late charge shall not exceed 5% of the total amount of the delinquent or late periodic installment of principal and interest.

History

Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-62, § 4, 31 DCR 114

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28-3301.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-3310.